Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2150
Financing; pledge of taxes.

In the proceedings for the issuance of bonds, the making of loans or advances of money, or the incurring of any indebtedness, whether funded, refunded, assumed, or otherwise, by an authority to finance or refinance, in whole or in part, a redevelopment project, the portion of taxes mentioned in subdivision (1)(b) of section 18-2147 shall be pledged for the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on such bonds, loans, notes, advances, or indebtedness.

Laws 1979, LB 158, § 13;

Laws 1997, LB 875, § 15.